Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.310

Businesses—Rules coordinator to provide list of rules.

The rules coordinator under RCW 34.05.310 shall be knowledgeable regarding the agency's rules that affect businesses. The rules coordinator shall provide a list of agency rules applicable at the time of the request to a specific class or line of business, which are limited to that specific class or line as opposed to generic rules applicable to most businesses, to the *business assistance center when so requested by the *business assistance center for the specific class or line of business.

[ 1992 c 197 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The business assistance center and its powers and duties were terminated June 30, 1995. RCW 43.31.083, 43.31.085, 43.31.087, and 43.31.089 were repealed by 1993 c 280 s 81, effective June 30, 1996.